en: peanut oil
ar: زيت فول سوداني
be: Арахісавы алей
bg: Фъстъчено олио
ca: Oli de cacauet
cs: jádra podzemnice olejné
da: Peanutolie
de: Erdnussöl
eo: Arakida oleo
es: Aceite de cacahuete, aceite de cacahuate, aceite de maní
eu: Kakahuete olio
fa: روغن بادام زمینی
fi: Maapähkinäöljy
fr: huile d'arachide, huiles végétales d'arachide
gl: Aceite de cacahuete
hr: ulje od kikirikija
hu: földimogyoró olaj, földimogyoróolaj, földimogyoró-olaj
id: Minyak kacang
it: Olio di semi di arachide
ja: ピーナッツオイル
kn: ಶೇಂಗಾ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 땅콩기름
lt: Žemės riešutų aliejus
mr: शेंगदाणा तेल
ms: Minyak kacang
nb: Peanøttolje
nl: Pindaolie
nn: Jordnøttolje
pl: Olej arachidowy, olej z orzeszków ziemnych
pt: Óleo de amendoim
ru: Арахисовое масло
sv: Jordnötsolja
ta: கடலையெண்ணெய்
te: వేరుశనగ నూనె
zh: 花生油

en: sesame oil, sesame seed oil
ar: زيت السمسم
be: Кунжутавы алей
bg: Сусамово олио
ca: Oli de sèsam
cs: Sezamový olej
da: Sesamolie
de: Sesamöl
dv: ތިލެޔޮ
el: Σησαμέλαιο
es: aceite de sésamo
et: Seesamiõli
eu: Sesamo olio
fa: روغن کنجد
fi: Seesamiöljy
fr: huile de sésame
he: שמן סומסום, שמן שומשום
hi: तिल का तेल
hr: sezamovo ulje
hu: szezámolaj, szezámmagolaj
hy: Քունջութի ձեթ
id: Minyak wijen
is: Sesamolía
it: Olio di sesamo, Olio di semi di sesamo
ja: ごま油
kk: Күнжіт майы
kn: ಎಳ್ಳೆಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 참기름
lt: Sezamų aliejus
ml: നല്ലെണ്ണ
ms: Minyak bijan
nb: Sesamolje
nl: Sesamolie, sesam-olie
nn: Sesamolje
os: Кунжуты зети
pl: Olej sezamowy
pt: Óleo de sésamo
ro: Ulei de susan
ru: Кунжутное масло
sl: Sezamovo olje
so: Saliid Macsaro
sv: sesamolja
ta: நல்லெண்ணெய்
te: నువ్వుల నూనె
tr: Susam yağı
uk: Кунжутна олія
vi: Dầu mè
zh: 芝麻油

en: toasted sesame oil, roasted sesame oil
da: sesamolie af ristede sesamfrø
lt: skrudintų sezamų aliejus
nb: sesamolje av ristet sesamfrø
sv: olja från rostade sesamfrön

en: refined sesame oil
de: raffiniertes Sesamöl
es: aceite de sésamo refinado
fr: huile de sésame raffinée
hr: rafinirano sezamovo ulje
it: olio di sesamo raffinato
pl: rafinowany olej sezamowy

en: organic sesame oil
bg: био сусамово олио
de: ökologisch hergestelltes Sesamöl
es: aceite de sésamo orgánico
fi: luomu seesamiöljy
fr: Huile de sésame biologique
hr: organsko sezamovo ulje
hu: bio szezámolaj, bio szezámmagolaj
it: olio di sesamo biologico
nl: olie van biologische sesamzaadjes

en: Virgin sesame oil, sesame oil virgin
ar: زيت سمسم بكر, زيت سمسم طبيعي
be: віргіннае масла кунжуту, масла кунжуту віргіннае
bg: нерафинирано сусамово масло, нерафинирано масло от сусам
ca: oli verge de sèsam, oli de sèsam verge
cs: panenský sezamový olej, panenský olej ze sezamu
da: jomfru sesamolie, jomfru olie af sesam
de: natives Sesamöl, natives Sesam-Öl
el: παρθένο λάδι σουσαμιού, παρθένο λάδι σησαμιού
es: aceite de sésamo virgen, aceite de sésamo natural
et: neitsi seesamiõli, neitsiõli seesamist
eu: sesamo olio birjina, sesamo olio naturala
fa: روغن سمسم خام, روغن سمسم طبیعی
fi: neitsyt seesamiöljy, neitsytöljy seesamista
fr: huile vierge de sésame, huile de sésame vierge
gl: aceite de sésamo virxe, aceite de sésamo natural
he: שמן שומשום טהור, שמן שומשום טבעי
hi: जंगली तिल का तेल, जंगली तिल का तेल
hr: djevičansko ulje od sezama, prirodno ulje od sezama
hu: szűz szezámmagolaj
hy: անհանգստավոր կունջութի ձեթ, սեզամի ձեթ
id: minyak wijen murni, minyak wijen alami
is: óraffinert sesamolía, óraffinert olía úr sesamfræjum
it: olio di sesamo vergine, olio di sesamo naturale
ja: 純正ごま油, 天然ごま油
kk: күнжіт майы тамырлас, күнжіт майы табиғатты
kn: ಪವಿತ್ರ ಎಳ್ಳೆಣ್ಣೆ, ಸೇಸಮ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 순참기름, 천연 참기름
lt: grynoji sezamų aliejus, natūralusis sezamų aliejus
ml: പവിത്ര നല്ലെണ്ണ, സെസാമുണ്ണ
ms: Minyak bijan tulen, Minyak bijan semulajadi
nb: jomfru sesamolje, naturlig sesamolje
nl: biologische sesamolie, natuurlijke sesamolie
nn: jomfru sesamolje, naturleg sesamolje
os: кунжуты зеты, кунжуты зеты зæгъæгъæй
pl: olej z pierwszego tłoczenia z sezamu, naturalny olej z sezamu
pt: óleo de sésamo virgem, óleo de sésamo natural
ro: ulei de susan virgin, ulei de susan natural
ru: нерафинированное кунжутное масло, натуральное масло из кунжута
sl: deviško sezamovo olje, naravno olje iz sezama
so: saliid macsaro dabiiciga ah
sv: jungfrulig sesamolja, naturlig sesamolja
ta: பவித எள்ளெண்ணெய், இயற்கை எள்ளெண்ணெய்
te: పవిత్ర నువ్వుల నూనె, ప్రాకృతిక నువ్వుల నూనె
tr: soğuk sıkım susam yağı, doğal susam yağı
uk: нерафінована кунжутна олія, натуральна олія з кунжуту
vi: dầu mè nguyên chất, dầu mè tự nhiên
zh: 纯正芝麻油, 天然芝麻油

en: soya oil, soybean oil, soy oil, soyabean oil
ar: زيت فول الصويا
be: Соевы алей
bg: соево олио, соево масло
ca: oli de soia, oli de soja, oli vegetal de soja
cs: sójový olej
da: sojaolie
de: Sojaöl, Sojabohnenöl, Sojafett, Sojabohnen Ôl
eo: sojoleo
es: aceite de soja, aceite vegetal de soja
eu: soja-olio
fa: روغن سویا
fi: soijaöljy, soijapapuöljy
fr: huile de soja, huiles végétales de soja
gl: aceite de soia
he: שמן סויה
hr: sojino ulje, sojino ulja
hu: szójaolaj, szójababolaj
id: minyak kedelai
it: olio di semi di soia, olio di soia
ja: 大豆油
ko: 콩기름
lt: sojų aliejus
ms: minyak kacang soya
nb: soyaolje
nl: sojaolie
pl: olej sojowy, olej roślinny sojowy, oleje roślinne sojowy
pt: óleo de soja
ro: ulei vegetal de soia, ulei din boabe de soia
ru: соевое масло, масло соевое, масло растительное соевое
sv: sojabönsolja, sojaolja, sojaböns olja
uk: соєва олія
zh: 大豆油

en: non-gmo soybean oil
de: nicht-GVO-Sojaöl
es: aceite de soja no transgénico
fr: huile de soja non-OGM
hr: ne-gmo sojino ulje
it: olio di soia non OGM
nl: non-gmo sojaolie

en: refined soya oil
bg: рафинирано соево олио, соево рафинирано олио
hr: rafinirano sojino ulje
it: olio di soia raffinato
pl: rafinowany olej sojowy
sv: raffinerad sojaolja

en: hydrogenated soy oil
bg: хидрогенирано соево олио
de: gehärtetes Sojaöl
es: Aceite de soja hidrogenada
fi: kovetettu soijaöljy, hydrogenoitu soijaöljy
fr: huile de soja hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirano sojino ulje
hu: hidrogénezett szójaolaj
it: Olio di soia idrogenato
pt: azeite de soja hidrogenado, azeite de oliva de soja hidrogenado

en: partially hydrogenated soybean oil
de: Sojabohnenöl teilweise hydriert
es: Aceite de soja parcialmente hidrogenado
fr: Huile de soja partiellement hydrogénée
hr: djelomično hidrogenirano ulje soje
it: Olio di semi di soia idrogenato

en: Rice bran oil
ar: زيت نخالة الرز
bn: চাল তুষ তেল
ca: Oli de segó d'arròs
de: Reisöl
es: Aceite de salvado de arroz.
fa: روغن سبوس برنج
fi: riisileseöljy
fr: huile de riz, huile de son de riz
he: שמן סובין אורז
hi: धान की भूसी का तेल
hr: ulje rižinih mekinja
hu: rizskorpaolaj, rizskorpa olaj
it: olio di riso
ja: こめ油
kn: ಅಕ್ಕಿತವುಡು ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 겨기름
lt: Ryžių sėlenų aliejus
ml: തവിടെണ്ണ
nl: Rijstolie
sv: riskliolja
ta: அரிசித் தவிட்டு எண்ணெய்
te: తవుడు నూనె
th: น้ำมันรำข้าว
uk: Рисова олія
zh: 米糠油

en: shea butter, shea, shea fat
ak: Nkuto
ar: زبدة الشيا
bg: Масло от ший, ший
cs: bambucké máslo, bambucký tuk
da: sheasmør, shea, sheafedt
de: Shea Butter, Sheabutter, Shea, Sheafett
el: λίπος shea
eo: karitea butero
es: manteca de karité, grasa de karite, karite, shea
fi: karitevoi, sheavoi, shea, karite, sheaydin, shearasva
fr: beurre de karité, matière grasse de karité, karité, graisses végétales de karité, huile de karité, huile végétale de karité, huiles végétales de karité
he: חמאת שיאה
hr: shea maslac, shea, šea, karite maslac, shea mast
hu: sheavaj, shea, sheazsír
it: Burro di karité, karité
ja: シアバター
ko: 시어 버터
lv: šī sviests
ms: Mentega syea
nb: sheasmør, shea, sheafett
nl: sheaboter, shea, sheavet
pl: masło shea, shea, tłuszcz shea, tłuszcze shea, tłuszcze roślinne shea
pt: ori, shea
ro: unt de shea, shea
ru: Масло дерева ши
sk: Bambucké maslo
sl: Karitejevo maslo
sv: Sheasmör, shea, sheafett
th: เนยเชีย
zh: 乳木果油

en: shea oil, sheanut oil
cs: bambucký olej
da: sheaolie
de: Sheaöl
hr: shea ulje
it: olio di karité
pl: olej shea, olej roślinny shea
ro: ulei de shea
sv: sheaolja

en: sunflower fat
de: Sonnenblumenfett
fi: auringonkukkarasva
fr: Matière grasse issue du tournesol, matière grasse de tournesol
hr: suncokretova mast
hu: napraforgózsír
it: olio idrogenato di semi di girasole
pl: tłuszcz słonecznikowy, tłuszcz roślinny słonecznikowy, tłuszcze roślinne słonecznikowy

en: fully hydrogenated sunflower fat
de: ganz gehärtetes Sonnenblumenfett
fr: graisse de tournesol entièrement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenizirana suncokretova mast
it: grasso di girasole completamente idrogenato
nl: zonnebloemvet geheel gehard, geheel geharde zonnebloem

en: safflower oil, safflower vegetable oil
bg: шафраново масло
de: Distelöl, Färberdistelöl
es: aceite ce cártamo
fi: safloriöljy
fr: huile de carthame
hr: ulje šafranike
hu: pórsáfrány olaj
it: olio di semi di cartamo
nl: saffloerolie
pl: olej z krokosza barwierskiego
ro: ulei de șofrănel

en: safflower fat
de: Distelfett, Färberdistelfett
it: grasso di cartamo

en: Shorea robusta seed oil, Shorea robusta oil, sal tree oil, sal oil
da: salolie, sal
de: Salöl
es: aceite de Shorea robusta, aceite de sal
fi: sal
fr: huile de sal, huile végétale de sal, graisses végétales de sal, matières grasses de sal, matières grasses végétales de sal
hr: sal
it: olio di Shorea robusta
kn: ಅಶ್ವಕರ್ಣ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
nb: salolje, sal
nl: sal
pl: olej z sal
sv: salolja, sal
te: సాల్‌సీడ్ నూనె

en: sal fat
da: salfedt
de: Salfett
fi: sal kasvirasvat
hr: slana mast
it: grasso di sale
nb: salfett
pl: tłuszcz sal, tłuszcz z sal
sv: salfett, sal vegetabiliskt fett